Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8908
Veterinarian-client-patient relationship, defined.

Veterinarian-client-patient relationship means a relationship pursuant to which (1) a veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making clinical judgments regarding the health of an animal and the need for medical treatment and the client has agreed to follow the veterinarian's instructions, (2) the veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal, meaning that the veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal by virtue of an examination of the animal or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal is kept, and (3) the veterinarian is readily available or has arranged for emergency coverage and for followup evaluation in the event of adverse reactions or the failure of the treatment regimen.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 8.